Utah statutes.
20A-3-605.   Exemption from early voting for a local district election --
Optional early voting for fifth class municipality or town.
(1)  This part does not apply to an election of a board member of a local
district.
(2)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Section 20A-3-601, a municipality of
the fifth class or a town as described in Section 10-2-301 may provide early
voting as provided under this part for:
(a)  a municipal primary election; or
(b)  a municipal general election.
